Tennessee, session 114, HB1417.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Chapter 553 of the Acts of 1903, as amended by Chapter 311 of the
Private Acts of 1974, and Chapter 233 of the Private Acts of 1978, and any other acts
amendatory thereto, is amended by deleting the first paragraph of Section 16B and substituting
instead:
Sec. 16B. Election, compensation, and qualifications of city judge. The
term of the City Judge of the City of Tullahoma holding office on the effective date of this
act who was elected pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 16-18-203, is
extended for one (1) year from when it expires in August 2025 to the first Thursday in
August 2026. Thereafter the City Judge of the City of Tullahoma is elected at the same
time as members of the Board of Mayor and Aldermen are elected at the biannual
municipal elections held on the first Thursday in August in each even-numbered year.
Beginning in the year 2026, the City Judge shall be elected for a term of eight (8) years
and thereafter there shall be an election for said office every eight (8) years. The City
Judge's compensation shall be established from time to time by the Board of Mayor and
Aldermen by ordinance. The Judge shall be elected by the members of the public at-
large qualified to vote in municipal elections. The Judge shall have such duties and
powers as are prescribed by the Code of the City of Tullahoma and by any ordinances
enacted pursuant thereto. The Judge shall be a practicing attorney in good standing,
admitted to practice before the courts of the State of Tennessee, and shall have been a
resident of and maintain his or her domicile in the City of Tullahoma for one (1) year prior
HB1417
003215
- 1 -

to said election. The determination of residency shall be as established as set forth in
Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-2-122.
SECTION 2. If any provision of this act or the application thereof to any person or
circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the
act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to that end the
provisions of this act are declared to be severable.
SECTION 3. This act shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote
of the legislative body of the City of Tullahoma. Its approval or non-approval shall be
proclaimed by the presiding officer of the legislative body and certified to the secretary of state.
SECTION 4. For the purpose of approving or rejecting the provisions of this act, it shall
be effective upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, it shall
become effective as provided in Section 3.
- 2 - 003215